Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202586-1077
Civil penalty.

The commission may assess a civil penalty pursuant to section 75-156 for each violation of any provision of the 911 Service System Act or any rule, regulation, or order of the commission issued under authority delegated to the commission pursuant to the act.

Laws 2003, LB 187, § 30;

R.S.1943, (2024), § 86-470;

Laws 2025, LB362, § 59.